Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Division of Geographic Information Systems

42.630.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

Much of the Commonwealth’s information is geographically referenced and may be presented through geographic information systems;

Geographic information systems allow for the exchange of information between levels of government and facilitate the management of the Commonwealth’s natural, human, cultural, and economic resources;

There is a need to reduce redundancy in data-collection and development efforts, to coordinate the various activities in geographic information systems, and to share geographic information system resources and expertise to maximize the Commonwealth’s investment in geographic information systems technology;

Considerations of cost and the need for the transfer of information among agencies of state government in the most timely and useful form possible require a uniform policy and coordinated approach for the use of geographic information systems;

It is the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to coordinate and direct the use of geographic information resources and technologies to provide the most cost-effective and useful retrieval of information by its elected and appointed officials.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 327, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

42.640.
Definitions for KRS 42.650. [Repealed.]

42.650.
Division of Geographic Information Systems — Powers and duties — Authority for administrative regulations.

The Division of Geographic Information Systems is hereby established in the Office of Architecture and Governance within the Commonwealth Office of Technology in the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Division of Geographic Information Systems shall be headed by a division director, whose appointment is subject to KRS

12.050

. The division director may employ personnel, pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A, as required to perform the functions of the office.

The division may solicit, receive, and consider proposals for funding from any state agency, federal agency, local government, university, nonprofit organization, or private person or corporation. The division may also solicit and accept money by grant, gift, donation, bequest, legislative appropriation, or other conveyance.

The division shall:

Establish the central statewide geographic information clearinghouse to maintain map inventories, information on current and planned geographic information systems applications, information on grants available for the acquisition or enhancement of geographic information resources, and a directory of geographic information resources available within the state or from the federal government;

Make all reasonable efforts to collect and present geographic information in a manner which meets the needs of all state agencies;

Coordinate multiagency geographic information system projects, including overseeing the development and maintenance of statewide base maps and geographic information systems;

Provide access to both consulting and technical assistance, and education and training, on the application and use of geographic information technologies to state and local agencies;

Maintain, update, and interpret geographic information and geographic information systems standards, under the direction of the council;

Provide geographic information system services, as requested, to agencies wishing to augment their geographic information system capabilities;

In cooperation with other agencies, evaluate, participate in pilot studies, and make recommendations on geographic information systems hardware and software;

Assist the council with review of agency information resource plans and participate in special studies as requested by the council;

Provide staff support and technical assistance to the Geographic Information Advisory Council; and

Prepare proposed legislation and funding proposals for the General Assembly which will further solidify coordination and expedite implementation of geographic information systems.

The division may promulgate necessary administrative regulations for the furtherance of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 327, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 57, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 69, § 7, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 4, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 229, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

42.655.
Geographic information clearinghouse — Availability to state agencies — Administrative regulations.

The geographic information clearinghouse maintained by the Division of Geographic Information Systems shall be the sole database of geographic information maintained by state agencies. The Division of Geographic Information Systems shall make the clearinghouse available to all state agencies.

The division shall make all reasonable efforts to collect and present geographic information in a manner that meets the needs of all state agencies.

Pursuant to the procedures described in KRS

12.090

, any head of a state agency may request modifications to the methods of geographic information collection and presentation utilized by the Division of Geographic Information Systems to meet the needs of the state agency.

State agencies shall, whenever possible, request and use nonlicensed geographic information in order to allow the Division of Geographic Information Systems to effectively discharge its statutory responsibility to maintain an accurate and complete central statewide geographic information clearinghouse for official state use.

State agencies shall, whenever possible, consolidate their requests for the collection, purchase, or creation of geographic information into multiagency projects to minimize redundancy within the clearinghouse and to lower overall costs.

The Division of Geographic Information Systems may promulgate necessary administrative regulations for the furtherance of this section.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 229, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

42.660.
Definitions for KRS 42.660 to 42.680. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.665.
Kentucky Community Crisis Response Board — Members — Meetings. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.670.
Duties of board. [Repealed and reenacted.]

42.675.
Attorney General to represent board members in civil proceedings. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.680.
Status of state and local government employees acting on behalf of board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.700.
Medical professional liability insurance for charitable health care facilities and volunteer caregivers — Fee on physicians and attorneys for payment of premiums. [Repealed.]